Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 5 Support of the Needy

40-5-1.
Obligation of towns.

Every town shall be required to relieve and support all poor and indigent persons lawfully settled therein, whenever they shall stand in need of relief and support, and to afford temporary relief to other poor and indigent persons.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 79, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 93, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 105, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 69, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

40-8-1

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-5-2.
Oversight of poor by directors of public welfare.

The directors of public welfare shall have the care and oversight of all such poor and indigent persons settled in their respective towns.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 79, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 93, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 105, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 69, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

40-8-2

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-5-3.
Manner of support of poor.

The directors of public welfare shall see that poor and indigent persons in their respective towns are suitably relieved, supported, and employed, either in the workhouse or in other tenements belonging to towns, or in such other way and manner as the inhabitants of the respective towns at any legal meeting shall direct, or otherwise at the discretion of the directors. They may also afford temporary relief to other poor and indigent persons at the cost of the town.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 79, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 93, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 105, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 69, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

40-8-3

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-5-4.
Manner of relief in Providence.

The city council of the city of Providence may prescribe the mode in which, and extent to which, the director of public welfare of the city shall afford temporary relief to poor and indigent persons who are not supported and employed in the asylum, or other tenements belonging to or used by the city.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 79, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 93, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 105, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 69, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

40-8-4

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-5-5 — 40-5-9.
[Repealed.]

40-5-10.
Complaint as to neglect of pauper.

Whenever any pauper shall not be suitably cared for by the town to which he or she is chargeable, any person, upon first issuing five (5) days’ notice to the state director of human services or directors of public welfare of the town of the situation of the pauper, and on continued neglect of the town, may complain in writing to the superior court, setting forth as nearly as may be the nature of the grievance complained of.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 79, § 18; C.P.A. 1905, § 1108; G.L. 1909, ch. 93, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 105, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 69, § 17; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; G.L. 1956, §

40-8-10

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1990, ch. 442, § 13.

40-5-11.
Investigation of complaints.

The superior court may, after ordering notice to the town of the pendency of the complaint, appoint a commission of not exceeding three (3) persons, who shall visit the pauper or paupers concerning whom the complaint is made and, upon hearing the allegations and evidence of the parties, report to the court, as soon as may be, whether or not the complaint is well founded.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 79, § 19; C.P.A. 1905, § 1109; G.L. 1909, ch. 93, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 105, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 69, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

40-8-11

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-5-12.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 79, § 24; G.L. 1909, ch. 93, § 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 105, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 69, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

40-8-12

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; Repealed by P.L. 2004, ch. 201, § 3, effective July 1, 2004; P.L. 2004, ch. 350, § 3, effective July 1, 2004.

40-5-13.
Obligation of kindred for support.

The kindred of any poor person, if any he or she shall have in the line or degree of father or grandfather, mother or grandmother, children or grandchildren, by consanguinity, or children by adoption, living within this state and of sufficient ability, shall be holden to support the pauper in proportion to their ability.

The uncompensated costs of care provided by a licensed nursing facility to any person may be recovered by the nursing facility from any person who is obligated to provide support to that patient under subsection (a) hereof, to the extent that the individual so obligated received a transfer of any interests or assets from the patient receiving such care, which transfer resulted in a period of Medicaid ineligibility imposed pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1396p(c), as amended from time to time, on a person whose assets have been transferred for less than fair market value.

Recourse hereunder shall be limited to the fair market value of the interests or assets transferred at the time of transfer. For the purposes of this section “the costs of care” shall mean the costs of providing care, including nursing care, personal care, meals, transportation and any other costs, charges, and expenses incurred by the facility. Costs of care shall not exceed the customary rate the nursing facility charges to a patient who pays for his or her care directly rather than through a governmental or other third party payor. Nothing contained in this section shall prohibit or otherwise diminish any other causes of action possessed by any such nursing facility. The death of the person receiving nursing facility care shall not nullify or otherwise affect the liability of the person or persons charged with the costs of care hereunder.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 79, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 93, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 105, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 69, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

40-8-13

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 5, § 7.

40-5-14.
Enforcement of support obligation of kindred.

The district court at any session thereof in any county where any kindred shall reside, upon the petition of the director of public welfare of any town, or the department of human services of the state through its representative duly appointed for that purpose, who shall have been at any expense for the relief and support of any pauper, may on due hearing, either upon the appearance or default of the kindred, they being summoned as prescribed in §

40-5-15

, assess and apportion such sum within the limitation of time prescribed by §

40-5-17

as the court shall judge reasonable therefor, upon such of the kindred as the court shall judge to be of sufficient ability, and according thereto, and may enforce payment thereof by warrant of distress.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 79, § 6; C.P.A. 1905, § 1216; G.L. 1909, ch. 93, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 105, § 6; P.L. 1930, ch. 1580, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 69, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; G.L. 1956, §

40-8-14

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1990, ch. 492, § 13; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 125.

40-5-15.
Citation and proceedings against kindred.

The director of public welfare of any town, or the department of human services of the state through its representative duly appointed, shall apply to the clerk of the district court for, and the clerk shall thereupon issue, a citation substantially in the form of the citation prescribed in §

44-5-26

; and the citation shall contain the name or names of the kindred, and the citation and petition shall in all respects follow the procedure, and be subject to the jurisdiction of the district courts as set forth in §§

8-8-3

—

8-8-5

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 79, § 7; C.P.A. 1905, § 1224; G.L. 1909, ch. 93, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 105, § 7; P.L. 1930, ch. 1580, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 69, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; G.L. 1956, §

40-8-15

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 42; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-5-16.
Proceedings against kindred not named in citation.

Upon suggestion made, other kindred of ability, not named in the citation, may be notified, and the process may be continued; and upon due notice, whether they appear or are defaulted, the court may proceed against them in the same manner as if they had been named in the citation.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 79, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 93, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 105, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 69, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

40-8-16

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-5-17.
Limitation of proceedings.

An assessment shall not extend to any expense for any relief afforded more than six (6) months previous to the filing of the petition.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 79, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 93, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 105, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 69, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

40-8-17

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-5-18.
Assessment of kindred for future support — Warrant for arrears.

The court may further assess and apportion upon any kindred such weekly sums for the future as they shall judge sufficient for the support of the pauper, to be paid quarterly into the clerk’s office of the court, to the use of the director, until further order of the court; and upon application, from time to time, of the director, the clerk of the court shall issue and may renew a warrant of distress for the arrears of any preceding quarter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 79, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 93, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 105, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 69, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

40-8-18

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-5-19.
Order as to residence of pauper.

The court may further order with any kindred who may desire it, that the pauper shall live and be relieved, for such time with one and for such time with another, as they shall judge proper, having regard to the comfort of the pauper as well as to the convenience of the kindred.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 79, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 93, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 105, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 69, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

40-8-19

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-5-20.
Recovery of costs by respondent.

If the petition be not entered, or be discontinued or withdrawn, or adjudged groundless, the respondent shall recover costs.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 79, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 93, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 105, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 69, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

40-8-20

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-5-21.
Alteration of orders and assessments.

Upon application of any party interested, the court may, from time to time, vary any order by it made in the premises, or alter any assessment or apportionment by it made as provided in this chapter, to meet a change of circumstances.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 79, § 13; G.L. 1909, ch. 93, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 105, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 69, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

40-8-21

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 125.